New York, session 2025-2026, A557.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 24 of the state finance law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. In each budget bill submitted annually by the governor, and in 4 every amendment thereof submitted by the governor, which appropriates 5 moneys to the education department for the support of school districts, 6 there shall be included for each such appropriation, the apportionment 7 thereof to each individual school district in the state. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02053-01-5